Wisconsin, session 2025, AB394.
do enact as follows:AB394,13Section 1. 38.04 (4) (e) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB394,2,2438.04 (4) (e) 10. Includes instruction relating to student crossing, school bus 1lights, and when stops are required for a stopped school bus, including how 2requirements are affected by highway configuration.AB394,23Section 2. 115.28 (11) (i) of the statutes is created to read:AB394,2,64115.28 (11) (i) Include instruction relating to student crossing, school bus 5lights, and when stops are required for a stopped school bus, including how 6requirements are affected by highway configuration.AB394,37Section 3. 343.71 (5) (j) of the statutes is created to read:AB394,2,108343.71 (5) (j) Includes instruction relating to student crossing, school bus 9lights, and when stops are required for a stopped school bus, including how 10requirements are affected by highway configuration.AB394,411Section 4. Initial applicability.AB394,2,1312(1) This act first applies to driver education courses that begin on the effective 13date of this subsection.AB394,2,1414